Utah statutes.
23-29-201.   Wolf management.

(1)  The division shall contact the service upon discovering a wolf in any area of the state where wolves are listed as threatened or endangered under the Endangered Species Act and request immediate removal of the animal from the state.

(2)  The division shall manage wolves to prevent the establishment of a viable pack in all areas of the state where the wolf is not listed as threatened or endangered under the Endangered Species Act until the wolf is completely delisted under the act and removed from federal control in the entire state.

(3)  Subsections (1) and (2) do not apply to wolves lawfully held in captivity and restrained.

